Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1389XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1389XD (3) 91
jm/jh

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 99F.18, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
99F.18 Tax on winnings.
1. All winnings derived from slot machines operated
pursuant to this chapter are Iowa earned income and are subject
to state and federal income tax laws. An amount deducted from
winnings for payment of the state tax, pursuant to section
422.16, subsection 2, shall be remitted to the department of
revenue on behalf of the winner.
2. All winnings from sports wagering authorized under this
chapter are Iowa earned income and are subject to state and
federal income tax laws. An amount deducted from winnings for
payment of state tax pursuant to section 422.16, subsection 2,
shall be remitted to the department of revenue on behalf of the
winner.
Sec. 2. Section 422.16, subsection 2, paragraph d, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
d. For the purposes of this subsection, state income tax
shall be withheld on winnings in excess of six hundred dollars
derived from gambling activities authorized under chapter
99B or 99G. State income tax shall be withheld on winnings
in excess of one thousand dollars from gambling activities
authorized under chapter 99D. State income tax shall be
withheld on winnings in excess of one thousand two hundred
dollars derived from slot machines authorized under chapter
99F. State income tax shall be withheld on winnings from
sports wagering authorized under chapter 99F whenever federal
income tax is required to be withheld from the same winnings in
accordance with the Internal Revenue Code.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect January 1,
2026.